Washington statutes.
RCW 19.305.070

Enforcement of chapter—Authority.

To enforce this chapter, the attorney general and the state director of fire protection are authorized to examine the books, papers, invoices, and other records of any person in possession, control, or occupancy of any premises where cigarettes are placed, stored, sold, or offered for sale, as well as the stock of cigarettes on the premises. Every person in the possession, control, or occupancy of any premises where cigarettes are placed, sold, or offered for sale, is required to give the attorney general and the state director of fire protection the means, facilities, and opportunity for the examinations authorized by this section.

[ 2008 c 239 s 7.]